src/import/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjectives_v

@P.Stem.Nom@aasiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@´aas,iv MAGUS ;
abistav+A:abistav MAGUS ;
ahastav+A:ahastav MAGUS ;
ahenev+A:ahenev MAGUS ;
ahistav+A:ahistav MAGUS ;
ahvatlev+A:ahvatlev MAGUS ;
aimatav+A:aimatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@aimav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@´aimav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@aitav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@´aitav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ajav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@ajav MAGUS ;
alandav+A:alandav MAGUS ;
alarmeeriv+A:alarm´eeriv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@algav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@´algav MAGUS ;
alistuv+A:alistuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@alluv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@´alluv MAGUS ;
alustav+A:alustav MAGUS ;
ammendav+A:ammendav MAGUS ;
analüüsiv+A:anal´üüsiv MAGUS ;
andestatav+A:andestatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@antav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@´antav MAGUS ;
arendav+A:arendav MAGUS ;
arenev+A:arenev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@arglev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@´arglev MAGUS ;
armastav+A:armastav MAGUS ;
arvatav+A:arvatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@arvav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@´arvav MAGUS ;
arvestatav+A:arvestatav MAGUS ;
arvestav+A:arvestav MAGUS ;
arvustav+A:arvustav MAGUS ;
asetsev+A:asetsev MAGUS ;
astendatav+A:astendatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@astuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@´astuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@asuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@asuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@aurav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@´aurav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@austav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@´austav MAGUS ;
avanev+A:avanev MAGUS ;
avastatav+A:avastatav MAGUS ;
avatav+A:avatav MAGUS ;
baseeruv+A:bas´eeruv MAGUS ;
dissoneeruv+A:disson´eeruv MAGUS ;
domineeriv+A:domin´eeriv MAGUS ;
ebalev+A:ebalev MAGUS ;
edenev+A:edenev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@edev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@edev MAGUS ;
edvistav+A:edvistav MAGUS ;
eeldatav+A:´eeldatav MAGUS ;
eelistatav+A:eelistatav MAGUS ;
eelistav+A:eelistav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@eelnev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@´eelnev MAGUS ;
eemalduv+A:eemalduv MAGUS ;
ehitatav+A:ehitatav MAGUS ;
ehitav+A:ehitav MAGUS ;
ehmatav+A:ehmatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ehtiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@´ehtiv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@eirav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@´eirav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@eitav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@´eitav MAGUS ;
eksamineeritav+A:eksamineeritav MAGUS ;
eksisteeriv+A:eksist´eeriv MAGUS ;
eksitav+A:eksitav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@eksiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@´eksiv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ekslev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@´ekslev MAGUS ;
eksperimenteeriv+A:eksperiment´eeriv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@elav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@elav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@elev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@elev MAGUS ;
elustav+A:elustav MAGUS ;
ennetav+A:ennetav MAGUS ;
ennustav+A:ennustav MAGUS ;
eputav+A:eputav MAGUS ;
eraldatav+A:eraldatav MAGUS ;
eraldav+A:eraldav MAGUS ;
eralduv+A:eralduv MAGUS ;
erastatav+A:erastatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@erev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@erev MAGUS ;
erinev+A:erinev MAGUS ;
eristav+A:eristav MAGUS ;
eritlev+A:eritlev MAGUS ;
erutav+A:erutav MAGUS ;
esindav+A:esindav MAGUS ;
esinev+A:esinev MAGUS ;
esitatav+A:esitatav MAGUS ;
fraasitsev+A:fraas,itsev MAGUS ;
funktsioneeriv+A:funktsion´eeriv MAGUS ;
garanteeriv+A:garant´eeriv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@haarav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h´aarav MAGUS ;
haavatav+A:haavatav MAGUS ;
haigutav+A:haigutav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@haihtuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h´aihtuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@haisev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h´aisev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@hajuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@hajuv MAGUS ;
hakatav+A:hakatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@hakkav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h´akkav MAGUS ;
halastav+A:halastav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@haldav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h´aldav MAGUS ;
haletsev+A:haletsev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@halvav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h´alvav MAGUS ;
halvenev+A:halvenev MAGUS ;
halvustav+A:halvustav MAGUS ;
hammustav+A:hammustav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@hariv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@hariv MAGUS ;
harrastav+A:harrastav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@harv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h´arv%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
@P.Stem.Nom@heituv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h´eituv MAGUS ;
helendav+A:helendav MAGUS ;
helisev+A:helisev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@helkav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h´elkav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@helkiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h´el,kiv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@helklev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h´el,klev MAGUS ;
hellitav+A:hel,litav MAGUS ;
hellitlev+A:hel,litlev MAGUS ;
higistav+A:higistav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@hiilgav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h´iilgav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@hiiliv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h´iiliv MAGUS ;
himustatav+A:himustatav MAGUS ;
himustav+A:himustav MAGUS ;
himutsev+A:himutsev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@hindav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h´indav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@hingav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h´ingav MAGUS ;
hingitsev+A:hingitsev MAGUS ;
hinnatav+A:hinnatav MAGUS ;
hirmutav+A:hirmutav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@hoiatav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@hoiatav MAGUS ;
hooldatav+A:h´ooldatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@hooldav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h´ooldav MAGUS ;
hoolitsev+A:hool,itsev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@hooliv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h´ool,iv MAGUS ;
hoomatav+A:hoomatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@hooplev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h´ooplev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@hoovav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h´oovav MAGUS ;
hukutav+A:hukutav MAGUS ;
huligaanitsev+A:huligaanitsev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@hulkuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h´ulkuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@hurmav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h´urmav MAGUS ;
huvitav+A:huvitav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@hõljuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h´õl,juv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@hõlmav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h´õlmav MAGUS ;
hõrenev+A:hõrenev MAGUS ;
hõrgutav+A:hõrgutav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@hõõguv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h´õõguv MAGUS ;
häbenev+A:häbenev MAGUS ;
häbistav+A:häbistav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@häiriv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h´äiriv MAGUS ;
hämmastav+A:hämmastav MAGUS ;
hävitav+A:hävitav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@hääbuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h´ääbuv MAGUS ;
hääldatav+A:h´ääldatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@hüplev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h´üplev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@hüppav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h´üppav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@hüübiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h´üübiv MAGUS ;
igatsev+A:igatsev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@igav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@igav MAGUS ;
igavlev+A:igavlev MAGUS ;
ihaldatav+A:ihaldatav MAGUS ;
ihaldav+A:ihaldav MAGUS ;
ihalev+A:ihalev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ihkav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@´ihkav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ilmuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@´ilmuv MAGUS ;
ilustav+A:ilustav MAGUS ;
ilutsev+A:ilutsev MAGUS ;
imeteldav+A:imeteldav MAGUS ;
imetletav+A:imetletav MAGUS ;
imetlev+A:imetlev MAGUS ;
imiteeriv+A:imit´eeriv MAGUS ;
immitsev+A:immitsev MAGUS ;
imponeeriv+A:impon´eeriv MAGUS ;
informeeriv+A:inform´eeriv MAGUS ;
intervjueeritav+A:intervjueeritav MAGUS ;
intrigeeriv+A:intrig´eeriv MAGUS ;
irisev+A:irisev MAGUS ;
irvitav+A:irvitav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@istuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@´istuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@jaatav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@j´aatav MAGUS ;
jagatav+A:jagatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@jagav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@jagav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@jaguv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@jaguv MAGUS ;
jahmatav+A:jahmatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@jahtiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@j´ahtiv MAGUS ;
jalutav+A:jalutav MAGUS ;
jaotatav+A:j´aotatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@jaotav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@j´aotav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@jaotuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@j´aotuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@johtuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@j´ohtuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@jonklev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@j´onklev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@joodav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@j´oodav MAGUS ;
joovastav+A:joovastav MAGUS ;
juhatav+A:juhatav MAGUS ;
juhendav+A:juhendav MAGUS ;
juhitav+A:juhitav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@juhtiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@j´uhtiv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@juhtuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@j´uhtuv MAGUS ;
julgustav+A:julgustav MAGUS ;
jutustav+A:jutustav MAGUS ;
juubeldav+A:juubeldav MAGUS ;
juuritav+A:juuritav MAGUS ;
jõllitav+A:jõl,litav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@jõustuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@j´õustuv MAGUS ;
jälestav+A:jälestav MAGUS ;
jälgitav+A:j´äl,gitav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@jälgiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@j´äl,giv MAGUS ;
jälitatav+A:jälitatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@järgnev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@j´ärgnev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@jätkuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@j´ätkuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@jäädav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@j´äädav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@jääv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@j´ääv MAGUS ;
kaalutlev+A:kaalutlev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kaaluv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´aaluv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kaasnev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´aasnev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kaduv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@kaduv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kaebav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´aebav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kaetav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´aetav MAGUS ;
kahanev+A:kahanev MAGUS ;
kahetsetav+A:kahetsetav MAGUS ;
kahetsev+A:kahetsev MAGUS ;
kahjustav+A:kahjustav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kahtlev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´ahtlev MAGUS ;
kahtlustatav+A:kahtlustatav MAGUS ;
kahtlustav+A:kahtlustav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kaitstav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´aitstav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kaklev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´aklev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@kalduv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k´alduv MAGUS ;
